Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2207.17
Assignment results, defined.

Assignment results means the opinions or conclusions, not limited to value, developed by a real property appraiser when performing valuation services specific to real property appraisal practice.

Laws 2018, LB741, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 57.